motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
abradere/BTXI
accadere/BTXI
accedere/BTXI
accendere/BTXJI
accingere/BTXI
accludere/BTXI
accogliere/BTXI
accondiscendere/BTXI
accorgere/BTXI
accorrere/BTXI
accrescere/BTXI
adempiere/BTXI
affiggere/BTXqrI
affliggere/BTXI
aggiungere/BTXqrI
alludere/BTXqrI
ammettere/BTXqrI
annettere/BTXqrI
appartenere/BTXqrI
appendere/BTXqrI
apprendere/BTXqrI
ardere/BTXqrI
arrendere/BTXqrI
arridere/BTXqrI
ascendere/BTXI
ascrivere/BTXI
assistere/BTXqrI
assumere/BTXqrI
astenere/BTXqrI
attendere/BTXqrJI
attingere/BTXqrI
autodistruggere/BTXqrI
avere/BTXSqrI
avvedere/BI
battere/BI
bere/BI
cadere/BI
cedere/BeI
chiudere/BI
circoncidere/BI
coesistere/BI
coincidere/BI
combattere/BI
commuovere/BI
compiacere/BI
compiere/BI
comprendere/BJI
compromettere/BI
concernere/BI
concorrere/BI
condividere/BI
confondere/BI
connettere/BI
consistere/BI
contenere/BI
controbattere/BI
convincere/BI
correggere/BJI
corrispondere/BI
corrompere/BI
costringere/BI
crescere/BI
dattiloscrivere/BI
decedere/BI
decomprimere/BI
decrescere/BI
delinquere/BI
demordere/BI
deridere/BI
desistere/BI
detenere/BI
devolvere/BI
difendere/BI
diffrangere/BI
dipendere/BI
dirigere/BI
disapprendere/BI
discernere/BI
disconoscere/BI
discutere/BI
disperdere/BI
dissolvere/BI
distendere/BI
distogliere/BI
divergere/BI
dolere/BI
eccedere/BTXqrI
effondere/BTI
elidere/BTXqrI
emergere/BTXqrI
equivalere/BTXqrI
erigere/BTXqrI
escludere/BTXqrI
esimere/BTXqrI
espandere/BTXqrI
esplodere/BTXqrI
essere/BTXqrI
estinguere/BTXqrI
estromettere/BTXqrI
evadere/BTXqrI
evolvere/BTXqrI
fervere/BI
flettere/BI
fottere/BI
frangere/BI
friggere/BI
gemere/BI
giacere/BI
godere/BI
imbattere/BXTI
immanere/BTXqrI
immettere/BTXqrI
imprimere/BTXqrI
incidere/BTXqrI
incombere/BTXqrI
incutere/BTXqrI
infiggere/BTXqrI
infliggere/BTXqrI
inframmettere/BTXqrI
ingiungere/BTXqrI
insistere/BTXqrI
intendere/BTXqrI
interconnettere/BTXqrI
interpungere/BTXqrI
intessere/BTXqrI
intraprendere/BTXqrI
intravedere/BTXI
intridere/BTXqrI
intrudere/BTXqrI
invalere/BTXqrI
involvere/BTXqrI
irrompere/BTXqrI
ledere/BI
mantenere/BI
mescere/BI
mietere/BI
miscredere/BI
mungere/BI
nascere/BI
nuocere/BI
occorrere/BTXqrI
omettere/BTXqrI
ottenere/BTXJI
parere/BSI
pendere/BI
percuotere/BI
permanere/BI
persistere/BI
pervadere/BI
piangere/BI
plaudere/BI
possedere/BI
precludere/BI
preesistere/BI
preludere/BI
premettere/BI
prepotere/BSI
presiedere/BI
pretendere/BI
prevedere/BI
profondere/BI
promuovere/BI
prorompere/BI
protendere/BI
provvedere/BI
pungere/BJI
raccogliere/BI
radioassistere/BI
raggiungere/BI
ravvedere/BI
recedere/BI
recingere/BI
redimere/BI
reggere/BI
rendere/BI
rescindere/BI
respingere/BI
retrocedere/BI
riabbattere/BI
riammettere/BI
riappendere/BI
riassumere/BI
riavvolgere/BI
ricadere/BI
ricevere/BI
richiudere/BI
ricogliere/BI
riconcedere/BI
riconnettere/BI
ricrescere/BI
ridere/BI
ridirigere/BI
ridisciogliere/BI
ridiscutere/BI
ridividere/BI
riemergere/BI
riesplodere/BI
rifondere/BI
rifriggere/BI
rilucere/BI
rimettere/BI
rimpiangere/BI
rinascere/BI
rincorrere/BI
rinfondere/BI
ripercorrere/BI
ripetere/BI
riprendere/BI
risapere/BI
risedere/BI
risolvere/BI
risospingere/BI
rispondere/BI
ritenere/BI
ritingere/BI
ritorcere/BI
rivedere/BI
rivivere/BI
rivolvere/BI
rompere/BI
sbattere/BI
scegliere/BI
schiudere/BI
sciogliere/BI
scompiacere/BI
sconnettere/BI
scorgere/BI
scoscendere/BI
scuotere/BI
sedere/BSI
sfriggere/BI
smuovere/BI
soccombere/BI
soffondere/BI
soggiacere/BI
sommergere/BI
sopraggiungere/BI
soprascrivere/BI
sopravvivere/BI
sorgere/BI
sorreggere/BI
sospendere/BI
sostenere/BJI
sottendere/BI
sottomettere/BI
sovraintendere/BI
sovrintendere/BI
spargere/BI
spendere/BI
spiacere/BI
spiovere/BI
sporgere/BI
sprovvedere/BI
stingere/BI
strafottere/BI
stravincere/BI
stridere/BI
struggere/BI
succingere/BI
suddividere/BI
sussumere/BI
svendere/BI
svolvere/BI
telediffondere/BI
telericevere/BI
temere/BI
tenere/BI
tessere/BI
togliere/BI
trafiggere/BI
transigere/BI
trascendere/BI
trascrivere/BI
trasmettere/BI
travedere/BI
uccidere/BTXqrI
urgere/BTXqrI
vedere/BI
vertere/BI
vincere/BI
volere/SBI
